test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_saami_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - säämi: # i-stems # ok
    säämi+N+Sg+Nom: sääṃi
    säämi+N+Sg+Gen: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Acc: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Ill: sááṃán
    säämi+N+Sg+Loc: säämist
    säämi+N+Sg+Com: saamijn
    säämi+N+Sg+Abe: säˊmittáá
    säämi+N+Ess:    säämmin
    säämi+N+Par:    säämmid
    säämi+N+Pl+Nom: säämih
    säämi+N+Pl+Gen: [saamij, saˊmij]
    säämi+N+Pl+Acc: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Ill: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Loc: saamijn
    säämi+N+Pl+Com: saˊmijguin
    säämi+N+Pl+Abe: saˊmijttáá


  Noun - pyerá: # lovnâsääni, ij oro nuávditmin uánánemnjuolgâdusâid
    pyerá+N+Sg+Nom:  pyerá 
    pyerá+N+Sg+Gen:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Acc:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Ill:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Sg+Loc: pyerást
    pyerá+N+Sg+Com:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Sg+Abe:  pyeˊráttáá
    pyerá+N+Ess:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Par:  pyerád
    pyerá+N+Pl+Nom:  pyeráh
    pyerá+N+Pl+Gen:  [pyerái, pyeˊrái]
    pyerá+N+Pl+Acc:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Ill:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Loc:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Pl+Com:  pyeˊráiguin
    pyerá+N+Pl+Abe:  pyeˊráittáá
